Maryland, session 2026, SB0526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO DESIGNATE NOVEMBER 14 EACH
YEAR AS “RUBY BRIDGES WALK TO SCHOOL DAY” TO COMMEMORATE RUBY
BRIDGES, WHO, ON NOVEMBER 14, 1960, BECAME THE FIRST AFRICAN AMERICAN
STUDENT TO INTEGRATE AN ALL–WHITE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL IN NEW ORLEANS,
LOUISIANA.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0526*

SENATE BILL 526
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE RESOURCE MATERIALS
PUBLICLY AVAILABLE TO ASSIST LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS IN PLANNING A PROGRAM
OF EDUCATION FOR RUBY BRIDGES WALK TO SCHOOL DAY.
(2) THE RESOURCE MATERIALS PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) MAY INCLUDE INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS, INCLUDING
AGE–APPROPRIATE LESSON PLANS, DISCUSSION GUIDES, HISTORICAL DOCUMENTS,
AND MULTIMEDIA RESOURCES; AND
(II) SHALL INCLUDE RESOURCES TO ASSIST TEACHERS TO
ENGAGE STUDENTS IN DISCUSSIONS ABOUT CIVIL RIGHTS AND SOCIAL JUSTICE.
7–138.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO DESIGNATE THE SECOND
WEDNESDAY IN OCTOBER EACH YEAR AS “MARYLAND SCHOOL PEDESTRIAN
AWARENESS DAY” TO ENCOURAGE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS, IN COLLABORATION
WITH THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY, TO PROMOTE SAFE PEDESTRIAN ROUTES TO
AND FROM SCHOOLS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE RESOURCE MATERIALS PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE TO ASSIST LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS IN PLANNING MARYLAND SCHOOL
PEDESTRIAN AWARENESS DAY.
(C) THE RESOURCE MATERIALS PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY INCLUDE:
(1) PEDESTRIAN SAFETY BEST PRACTICES;
(2) AGE–APPROPRIATE PEDESTRIAN SAFETY LESSON PLANS;
(3) MODEL WALK AUDIT TEMPLATES AND DISCUSSION GUIDES;
(4) AVAILABLE GRANT RESOURCES; AND
(5) ANY OTHER MATERIALS RELATED TO PEDESTRIAN AWARENESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.